zh-TW: 親筆簽名認證: 親筆簽名 (未驗證); 製造商認證 (卡包開出); 無親筆簽名; 第三方認證; 見證認證; 其他
bg-BG: Удостоверяване на автограф: Собственоръчно подписан (непотвърден); Сертифициран от производителя (издаден в пакет); Без автограф; Удостоверен от трета страна; Удостоверяване пред свидетели; Друго
da: Autografgodkendelse: Håndsigneret (ikke bekræftet); Producentcertificeret (udstedt i pakke); Ikke signeret; Godkendt af tredjepart; Bekræftet af vidner; Andet
vi: Xác thực chữ ký: Ký tay (chưa xác minh); Được nhà sản xuất chứng nhận (đi kèm bộ thẻ); Không có chữ ký; Được bên thứ ba xác thực; Có người chứng kiến xác thực; Khác
ja: サインの認証: 直筆サイン (未検証); メーカー認証 (パック封入); サインなし; 外部機関による認証済み; 立会い認証; その他
sl-SI: Avtentikacija avtograma: Lastnoročno podpisano (nepreverjeno); Certifikat proizvajalca (v paketu); Brez avtograma; Preverjeno pri zunanjem izvajalcu; Preverjeno s pričo; Drugo
es: Autenticación de autógrafos: Firmado a mano (sin verificar); Certificación del fabricante (incluido en el paquete); No autografiado; Autenticado por un externo; Autenticación presenciada; Otra
it: Autenticazione dell'autografo: Firmato a mano (non verificato); Certificato dal produttore (emesso nella confezione); Non autografato; Autenticato da terze parti; Autenticazione con testimone; Altro
zh-CN: 亲笔签名认证: 手写签名（未经认证）; 制造商认证（随包发行）; 无签名; 第三方认证; 见证认证; 其他
cs: Ověřování autogramu: Vlastnoručně podepsáno (neověřeno); Certifikováno výrobcem (vydáno v balení); Bez autogramu; Ověřeno třetí stranou; Ověření za přítomnosti svědka; Ostatní
en: Autograph authentication: Hand-signed (unverified); Manufacturer certified (pack-issued); Not autographed; Third-party authenticated; Witnessed authentication; Other
tr: İmza doğrulaması: El imzası (doğrulanmamış); Üretici onaylı (paketten çıkma); İmzasız; Üçüncü taraf onaylı; Gözetmen eşliğinde onaylı; Diğer
el: Πιστοποίηση γνησιότητας αυτόγραφου: Χειρόγραφη υπογραφή (χωρίς επαλήθευση); Πιστοποίηση από τον κατασκευαστή (περιλαμβάνεται στη συσκευασία); Χωρίς αυτόγραφο; Πιστοποίηση από τρίτους; Πιστοποίηση με μάρτυρα; Άλλο
lt-LT: Autografo autentifikavimas: Pasirašyta ranka (nepatikrinta); Gamintojo sertifikuota (pakuotėje); Be autografo; Patvirtinta trečiosios šalies; Patvirtinta liudininkų; Kita
fi: Nimikirjoituksen todennus: Käsin allekirjoitettu (varmistamaton); Valmistajan sertifioima (paketin mukana); Ei nimikirjoitusta; Kolmannen osapuolen varmentama; Todistettu todennus; Muu
de: Autogramm-Authentifizierung: Handsigniert (nicht verifiziert); Herstellerzertifiziert (in Packung enthalten); Nicht signiert; Extern authentifiziert; Bezeugte Authentifizierung; Sonstige
th: การตรวจสอบลายเซ็น: เซ็นด้วยมือ (ไม่ได้รับการตรวจสอบ); รับรองโดยผู้ผลิต (มาพร้อมแพ็คเกจ); ไม่มีลายเซ็น; รับรองโดยบุคคลภายนอก; รับรองโดยมีพยาน; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Autenticação de autógrafo: Assinado à mão (não verificado); Certificado pelo fabricante (inserido no pacote); Não autografado; Autenticado por terceiros; Autenticação testemunhada; Outro
ro-RO: Autentificare autografă: Semnat manual (neverificat); Certificat de producător (inclus în pachet); Fără autograf; Autentificat de un terț; Autentificare cu martor; Altele
ko: 친필 인증: 친필 서명(미확인); 제조업체 인증(팩 발행); 서명 없음; 타사 인증됨; 입회 인증; 기타
sv: Autografverifiering: Handsignerad (overifierad); Tillverkarcertifierad (utfärdad med paketet); Osignerad; Tredjepartsautentiserad; Bevittnad autentisering; Annat
sk-SK: Overenie autogramu: Vlastnoručne podpísané (neoverené); Certifikované výrobcom (vydané v balení); Bez autogramu; Overené treťou stranou; Overené svedkom; Iné
hr-HR: Autentifikacija autograma: Rukom potpisano (nije provjereno); Certifikat proizvođača (izdano u paketu); Bez autograma; Potvrdila treća strana; Provjereno uz prisutnost svjedoka; Ostalo
ru: Подлинность автографа: Подписано вручную (не подтверждено); Сертифицировано производителем (из упаковки); Без автографа; Аутентификация сторонней организацией; Аутентификация в присутствии свидетелей; Другое
pl: Uwierzytelnienie autografu: Podpis odręczny (niezweryfikowany); Certyfikat producenta (wydany w paczce); Bez autografu; Uwierzytelnienie zewnętrzne; Uwierzytelnienie przy świadkach; Inne
nb: Autografgodkjenning: Håndsignert (uverifisert); Produsentsertifisert (utstedt i pakke); Ikke signert; Autentisert av tredjepart; Bekreftet autentisering ved vitne; Annet
nl: Handtekening authenticatie: Handgesigneerd (niet geverifieerd); Fabrikant-gecertificeerd (pack-issued); Geen handtekening; Geverifieerd door externe partij; Geverifieerd met getuige; Overige
fr: Authentification des autographes: Signé à la main (non vérifié); Certifié par le fabricant (émis dans un paquet); Non autographié; Authentifié par un tiers; Authentification par témoin; Autre
hu: Autogramhitelesítés: Kézzel aláírt (nem ellenőrzött); Gyártó által tanúsított (csomagolásban kiadott); Nincs dedikálva; Harmadik fél által hitelesítve; Tanúk által hitelesített; Egyéb
pt-PT: Autenticação por autógrafo: Assinado à mão (não verificado); Certificado pelo fabricante (incluído no pacote); Não autografado; Autenticado por terceiros; Autenticação testemunhada; Outros